test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-hwrak10_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - hõrak: # Noun (10) hõrak 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     hõrak+N+Sg+Nom: hõrak
     hõrak+N+Sg+Gen: [hõraga, hõragu]
     hõrak+N+Sg+Par: [hõrakat, hõrakut]
     hõrak+N+Sg+Ill: [hõrakahe, hõrakuhe, hõrakadõ, hõrakudõ]
     hõrak+N+Sg+Ine: [hõrakan, hõrakah, hõrakahn, hõrakun, hõrakuh, hõrakuhn]
     hõrak+N+Sg+Ela: [hõrakast, hõrakust]
     hõrak+N+Sg+All: [hõrakalõ, hõrakulõ]
     hõrakal+N+Sg+Ade: [hõrakal, hõrakul]
     hõrak+N+Sg+Abl: [hõrakalt, hõrakult]
     hõrak+N+Sg+Tra: [hõrakas, hõrakus]
     hõrak+N+Sg+Ter: [hõrakaniq, hõrakuniq]
     hõrak+N+Sg+Abe: [hõrakaldaq, hõrakuldaq]
     hõrak+N+Sg+Com: [hõrakagaq, hõrakugaq, hõragagaq, hõragugaq]
     hõrak+N+Pl+Nom: [hõragaq, hõraguq]
     hõrak+N+Pl+Gen: [hõrakidõ, hõrakiidõ]
     hõrak+N+Pl+Par: [hõrakit, hõrakiid]
     hõrak+N+Pl+Ill: [hõrakihe, hõrakiihe, hõrakidõ, hõrakiidõ]
     hõrak+N+Pl+Ine: [hõrakin, hõrakiin, hõrakih, hõrakiih, hõrakihn, hõrakiihn]
     hõrak+N+Pl+Ela: [hõrakist, hõrakiist]
     hõrak+N+Pl+All: [hõrakilõ, hõrakiilõ]
     hõrak+N+Pl+Ade: [hõrakil, hõrakiil]
     hõrak+N+Pl+Abl: [hõrakilt, hõrakiilt]
     hõrak+N+Pl+Tra: [hõrakis, hõrakiis]
     hõrak+N+Pl+Ter: [hõrakiniq, hõrakiiniq]
     hõrak+N+Pl+Abe: [hõrakildaq, hõrakiildaq]
     hõrak+N+Pl+Com: [hõrakidõgaq, hõrakiidõgaq]
